Utah statutes.
11-36a-504.   Notice of intent to adopt impact fee enactment -- Hearing -- Protections.

(1)  Before adopting an impact fee enactment:

(a)  a municipality legislative body shall:

(i)  comply with the notice requirements of Section 10-9a-205 as if the impact fee enactment were a land use ordinance;

(ii)  hold a hearing in accordance with Section 10-9a-502 as if the impact fee enactment were a land use ordinance; and

(iii)  except as provided in Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(b)(ii), receive the protections of Section 10-9a-801 as if the impact fee were a land use ordinance;

(b)  a county legislative body shall:

(i)  comply with the notice requirements of Section 17-27a-205 as if the impact fee enactment were a land use ordinance;

(ii)  hold a hearing in accordance with Section 17-27a-502 as if the impact fee enactment were a land use ordinance; and

(iii)  except as provided in Subsection 11-36a-701(3)(b)(ii), receive the protections of Section 17-27a-801 as if the impact fee were a land use ordinance;

(c)  a local district or special service district shall:

(i)  comply with the notice and hearing requirements of Section 17B-1-111; and

(ii)  receive the protections of Section 17B-1-111;

(d)  a local political subdivision shall at least 10 days before the day on which a public hearing is scheduled in accordance with this section:

(i)  make a copy of the impact fee enactment available to the public; and

(ii)  post notice of the local political subdivision's intent to enact or modify the impact fee, specifying the type of impact fee being enacted or modified, on the Utah Public Notice Website created under Section 63F-1-701; and

(e)  a local political subdivision shall submit a copy of the impact fee analysis and a copy of the summary of the impact fee analysis prepared in accordance with Section 11-36a-303 on its website or to each public library within the local political subdivision.

(2)  Subsection (1)(a) or (b) may not be construed to require involvement by a planning commission in the impact fee enactment process.



Enacted by Chapter 47, 2011 General Session

